dev/mt_wiktionary/noun.all.fat.dix
  <!-- pronunzja; pronunzj; 2 -->
    <pardef n="pronunzj/a__n_f">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>i</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- adorazzjoni; adorazzjoni; 2 -->
    <pardef n="adorazzjoni__n_f">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>jiet</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- kwalità; kwalit; 2 -->
    <pardef n="kwalit/à__n_f">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>à</l>
          <r>à<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ajiet</l>
          <r>à<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- ċerv; ċ; 2 -->
    <pardef n="ċ/erv__n_m">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>erv</l>
          <r>erv<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>riev</l>
          <r>erv<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- buffu; buff; 2 -->
    <pardef n="buff/u__n_m">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>u</l>
          <r>u<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>i</l>
          <r>u<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- dipartiment; dipartiment; 2 -->
    <pardef n="dipartiment__n_m">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>i</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- sigurtà; sigurt; 2 -->
    <pardef n="sigurt/à__n_f">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>à</l>
          <r>à<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ajiet</l>
          <r>à<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- rwol; rwol; 2 -->
    <pardef n="rwol__n_m">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>i</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- leħen; l; 2 -->
    <pardef n="l/eħen__n_m">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eħen</l>
          <r>eħen<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>iħna</l>
          <r>eħen<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- konnotazzjoni; konnotazzjoni; 2 -->
    <pardef n="konnotazzjoni__n_f">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>jiet</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- mogħża; mogħ; 2 -->
    <pardef n="mogħ/ża__n_f">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ża</l>
          <r>ża<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>oż</l>
          <r>ża<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- pustuletta; pustulett; 2 -->
    <pardef n="pustulett/a__n_f">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>i</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- xemgħa; xemgħa; 2 -->
    <pardef n="xemgħa__n_f">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>t</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- xoffa; x; 2 -->
    <pardef n="x/offa__n_f">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>offa</l>
          <r>offa<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ufftejn</l>
          <r>offa<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- lanġasa; lanġas; 2 -->
    <pardef n="lanġas/a__n_f">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- ġurnata; ġ; 2 -->
    <pardef n="ġ/urnata__n_f">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>urnata</l>
          <r>urnata<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ranet</l>
          <r>urnata<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- larinġa; larinġ; 2 -->
    <pardef n="larinġ/a__n_f">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- ajruplan; ajruplan; 2 -->
    <pardef n="ajruplan__n_m">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>i</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- siġġu; siġġ; 2 -->
    <pardef n="siġġ/u__n_m">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>u</l>
          <r>u<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ijiet</l>
          <r>u<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- operazzjoni; operazzjoni; 2 -->
    <pardef n="operazzjoni__n_f">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>jiet</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- attur; attur; 2 -->
    <pardef n="attur__n_m">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>i</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- qalb; q; 2 -->
    <pardef n="q/alb__n_m">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>alb</l>
          <r>alb<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>lub</l>
          <r>alb<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- diffikultà; diffikult; 2 -->
    <pardef n="diffikult/à__n_f">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>à</l>
          <r>à<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ajiet</l>
          <r>à<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- toqba_sewda; toq; 2 -->
    <pardef n="toq/ba_sewda__n_f">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ba_sewda</l>
          <r>ba_sewda<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ob<b/>suwed</l>
          <r>ba_sewda<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- soċjetà; soċjet; 2 -->
    <pardef n="soċjet/à__n_f">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>à</l>
          <r>à<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ajiet</l>
          <r>à<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="pronunzja"><i>pronunzj</i><par n="pronunzj/a__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="adorazzjoni"><i>adorazzjoni</i><par n="adorazzjoni__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="kwalità"><i>kwalit</i><par n="kwalit/à__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="ċerv"><i>ċ</i><par n="ċ/erv__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="buffu"><i>buff</i><par n="buff/u__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="dipartiment"><i>dipartiment</i><par n="dipartiment__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="sigurtà"><i>sigurt</i><par n="sigurt/à__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="rwol"><i>rwol</i><par n="rwol__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="leħen"><i>l</i><par n="l/eħen__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="konnotazzjoni"><i>konnotazzjoni</i><par n="konnotazzjoni__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="mogħża"><i>mogħ</i><par n="mogħ/ża__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="pustuletta"><i>pustulett</i><par n="pustulett/a__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="xemgħa"><i>xemgħa</i><par n="xemgħa__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="xoffa"><i>x</i><par n="x/offa__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="lanġasa"><i>lanġas</i><par n="lanġas/a__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="ġurnata"><i>ġ</i><par n="ġ/urnata__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="larinġa"><i>larinġ</i><par n="larinġ/a__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="ajruplan"><i>ajruplan</i><par n="ajruplan__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="siġġu"><i>siġġ</i><par n="siġġ/u__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="operazzjoni"><i>operazzjoni</i><par n="operazzjoni__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="attur"><i>attur</i><par n="attur__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="qalb"><i>q</i><par n="q/alb__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="diffikultà"><i>diffikult</i><par n="diffikult/à__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="toqba_sewda"><i>toq</i><par n="toq/ba_sewda__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="soċjetà"><i>soċjet</i><par n="soċjet/à__n_f"/></e>
